test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mueles_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mueʹles contract stem kevätvesi: # Noun - full paradigm
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: mueʹles
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: muâllaz
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: muâllaz
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: muâllsa
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: muâllsest
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Com+Indef: muâllsin
     mueʹles+N+Ess+Indef: muâllsen
     mueʹles+N+Par+Indef: muâllsed
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [muâllaztaa, muâllaztää]
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: muâllaz
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: muâllsi
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: muâllsid
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: muâllsid
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: muâllsin
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Com+Indef: muâllsivuiʹm
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [muâllsitaa, muâllsitää]
     
